Arkansas, session 2025, SB563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 33, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
2-33-117. Equine welfare — Penalties.
A person who commits the offense of cruelty to animals under § 5-62-
103(a)(4) against an equine is subject to civil penalties imposed by the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission not to exceed five thousand dollars
($5,000) per violation.

*CRH163*
04-07-2025 12:25:54 CRH163

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB563
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-62-103(a)(4), concerning the failure to
supply an animal with sufficient food and water under the offense of cruelty
to animals, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) Fails to supply an animal in his or her custody with a
sufficient quantity of wholesome food and water;.
(B) To determine if adequate food and water have been
supplied for an equine under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section, a body
condition score conducted by a licensed veterinarian may be used;

/s/Irvin


























04-07-2025 12:25:54 CRH163